Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2497.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 13GEVENT OUTCOME PREDICTION WAGERINGSubchapter1234567891011121314151617181920 A. Preliminary ProvisionsB. LicensingC. OperationsD. Enforcement and PenaltiesE. Miscellaneous ProvisionsSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.13G01. Scope of chapter.13G02. Definitions.§ 13G01. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the implementation, administration and enforcement of event outcome prediction wagering.§ 13G02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An event outcome prediction wagering platform that applies for an event outcome prediction wagering license."Application." An application for an event outcome prediction wagering license under section 13G14 (relating to application)."Digital service." An Internet website or mobile application."Event contract." A wagering agreement between an event outcome prediction wagering platform and an individual that:(1) Serves as the basis for event outcome prediction wagering.(2) Provides a payout based on the occurrence or nonoccurrence of a specified future event or circumstance, 20260HB2497PN3382 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which may involve an election, the weather, awards, sports competitions or any other economic, political or social event or circumstance."Event outcome prediction wagering" or "wagering." As follows:(1) The business of accepting wagers, setting odds to ensure a profit margin, making payouts and managing related transactions through an event contract by any system or method of wagering, including a digital service.(2) The term includes exchange wagering, parlays, over-under, moneyline, pools and straight bets regarding a prediction market.(3) The term does not include:(i) Pari-mutuel betting on the outcome of thoroughbred or harness horse racing as authorized under 3 Pa.C.S. Ch. 93 (relating to race horse industry reform).(ii) Lottery games of the Pennsylvania State Lottery as authorized under the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law.(iii) Bingo as authorized under the act of July 10, 1981 (P.L.214, No.67), known as the Bingo Law.(iv) Small games of chance as authorized under the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act.(v) Slot machine gaming and progressive slot machine gaming as defined and authorized under this part.(vi) Keno.(vii) Fantasy contests.(viii) iLottery under Chapter 5 (relating to 20260HB2497PN3382 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lottery)."Event outcome prediction wagering license" or "license." A license to conduct event outcome prediction wagering that:(1) is issued by the board under this chapter; and(2) authorizes an event outcome prediction wagering platform to conduct event outcome prediction wagering in accordance with this chapter."Event outcome prediction wagering licensee" or "licensee." An event outcome prediction wagering platform to whom the board has issued an event outcome prediction wagering license."Event outcome prediction wagering platform" or "platform." A digital service or clearinghouse designed to facilitate event outcome prediction wagering."Gross event outcome prediction wagering revenue." As follows:(1) The total money received by an event outcome prediction wagering licensee from event outcome prediction wagering minus the total of:(i) Money paid to participants as a result of the wagering.(ii) Money paid to purchase annuities to fund prizes payable to participants over a period of time as a result of the wagering.(2) The term does not include money taken in a fraudulent act perpetrated against the licensee for which the licensee is not reimbursed."Participant." An individual who executes an event contract, whether or not the individual has commenced the event outcome prediction wagering."Records." As follows:20260HB2497PN3382 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Information regarding event outcome prediction wagering that is:(i) Inscribed on a tangible medium or stored in an electronic or other medium.(ii) Retrievable in perceivable form.(iii) Aggregated or segregated in a manner prescribed by the board.(2) The term includes books, accounts, documents, data and other materials, including applications and their determinations, event contracts, financial information and other relevant information as prescribed by the board.SUBCHAPTER BLICENSINGSec.13G11. Wagering authorized.13G12. License required.13G13. Restrictions on wagering.13G14. Application.13G15. Review and determination.13G16. Issuance of license.13G17. Term of license.13G18. License renewal.13G19. Fees.§ 13G11. Wagering authorized.An event outcome prediction wagering platform may conduct event outcome prediction wagering in accordance with this chapter through the issuance of an event outcome prediction wagering license.§ 13G12. License required.Before conducting event outcome prediction wagering, an event 20260HB2497PN3382 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 outcome prediction wagering platform must obtain a license in accordance with this subchapter.§ 13G13. Restrictions on wagering.(a) Age of participants.--An individual under 21 years of age may not participate in event outcome prediction wagering.(b) Criminal purpose.--An individual may not participate in event outcome prediction wagering for a criminal or improper purpose, including:(1) Money laundering.(2) Insider trading.(3) The use of nonpublic information that the individual has acquired as a result of the individual's employment, position or social or business connections, or otherwise, to achieve a financial or other benefit.(c) Sensitive matters.--The board may restrict event outcome prediction wagering involving sensitive economic, political or social events or circumstances, including:(1) The conduct of an election, if the event outcome prediction wagering could affect the outcome of the election.(2) Military conflicts.(3) Natural disasters.(4) Judicial rulings.§ 13G14. Application.(a) Authorization.--A n event outcome prediction wagering platform may file an application for an event outcome prediction wagering license. The application shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the board.(b) Contents.--An application must include the following:(1) The name, business address and contact information of the applicant.20260HB2497PN3382 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The name, business address, job title and a photograph, consistent with standards prescribed by the board, of each principal and key employee of the applicant who will be involved in conducting the wagering.(3) A brief description of the economic benefits expected to be realized by the Commonwealth, its municipalities and its residents if the wagering is authorized.(4) The details of any financing obtained or that will be obtained to adequately fund the cost of commencing the wagering.(5) Information and documentation, as the board may require, to establish by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant:(i) Can demonstrate, through financial background and resources, the financial stability, integrity and responsibility to establish and maintain a successful wagering operation.(ii) Has sufficient business ability and experience to establish and maintain a successful wagering operation.(iii) Has or will have the financial ability to pay the license fee under section 13G19 (relating to fees).(6) For each principal and key employee of the applicant who will be involved in conducting the wagering, c onsent to a background investigation to be conducted by the bureau, which shall include fingerprinting in accordance with subsection (c).(7) Other information as the board may require.(c) Fingerprinting.--E ach principal and key employee of the 20260HB2497PN3382 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant who will be involved in conducting the wagering shall submit to fingerprinting by the Pennsylvania State Police or an authorized agent of the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police or the authorized agent shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purposes of verifying the identity of the individual and obtaining records of criminal arrests and convictions.(d) Confidentiality.--Information submitted to the board under subsection (b)(4) and (5) may be considered confidential by the board if the information would be confidential under section 1206(f) (relating to board minutes and records).§ 13G15. Review and determination.(a) Timing and basis of determination.--Within 120 days of the receipt of a completed application for a license, the board shall review and determine whether to approve the application and grant a license to the applicant, based on:(1) Whether the applicant has demonstrated that the information and documentation provided in the application are accurate and complete.(2) The background investigation for each principal and key employee of the applicant who will be involved in conducting the wagering.(3) Other information as the board may require.(b) Notice.--The board shall provide written notice of its determination under subsection (a), subject to the following:(1) If the board approves the application for the license, the board shall specify any conditions for approval.(2) If the board disapproves the application for the license, in whole or in part, the board shall provide the applicant with the reasons for the disapproval, and the 20260HB2497PN3382 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant may file a new or amended application, as prescribed by the board.§ 13G16. Issuance of license.(a) Issuance generally.--Upon approval of an application for a license, the board shall issue a license to the applicant, subject to the requirements under this chapter and any conditions prescribed by the board.(b) Payment of fee.--The issuance of a license prior to the payment in full of the fee required by section 13G19 (relating to fees) shall not relieve the applicant from complying with the provisions of section 13G19.(c) Conditions.--As part of its approval of a license, the board may attach conditions that the applicant must fulfill prior to or after the issuance of the license.§ 13G17. Term of license.(a) Validity.--A license shall be valid for one year, subject to:(1) the denial, renewal or suspension of the license by the board in accordance with this chapter; or(2) the relinquishment of the license by the licensee.(b) Renewal.--Notwithstanding section 1326 (relating to renewals), a license may be renewed in accordance with section 13G18 (relating to license renewal).§ 13G18. License renewal.(a) Authorization.--A licensee may seek to renew a license.(b) Procedures.--The board shall prescribe the process for the renewal of a license, including:(1) The form of the application for the license renewal, based on the information required under section 13G14 (relating to application).20260HB2497PN3382 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The manner in which the application for the license renewal must be filed with the board, including deadlines for filing.(3) The schedule for determining whether to approve the application for the license renewal.(4) The schedule for compliance with any condition that the board has prescribed in connection with the license renewal.(5) Any other procedure that the board may require.(c) Term.--A license renewal shall be valid for one year.(d) Payment of fee.--The issuance of a license renewal for a licensee prior to the payment in full of the license renewal fee required by section 13G19 (relating to fees) shall not relieve the licensee from complying with the provisions of section 13G19.§ 13G19. Fees.(a) Amount.--(1) Each licensee shall pay a nonrefundable license fee, as part of the license to conduct wagering, in the amount of $1,000,000.(2) Each licensee seeking a license renewal shall pay a nonrefundable license renewal fee, as part of the license renewal to conduct wagering, in the amount of $1,000,000.(b) Payment.--Subject to subsection (c), a licensee shall remit the license fee or license renewal fee under subsection (a) to the board within 60 days of the approval of the application for the license or license renewal.(c) Failure to pay by deadline.--If a licensee fails to pay the required license fee or license renewal fee in full within the period specified in subsection (b), the board:20260HB2497PN3382 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Shall impose a penalty on the licensee as prescribed by the board.(2) M ay grant the licensee up to a six-month extension to pay the license fee or license renewal fee, or any remaining portion of the license fee or license renewal fee, and the penalty.(d) License suspension.--The board shall suspend the license of a licensee if the licensee fails to pay the total license fee or license renewal fee and the penalty prior to the expiration of an extension period granted under subsection (c)(2). The suspension shall remain in effect until final payment is made.(e) Deposit of fees.--Notwithstanding section 1208 (relating to collection of fees and fines), all license fees, license renewal fees and penalties imposed in accordance with this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.SUBCHAPTER COPERATIONSSec.13G21. Commencement of event outcome prediction wagering operations.13G22. General duties of licensee.13G23. Records.13G24. Consumer protections.13G25. Disclosures.13G26. Wagering tax.13G27. Local share assessment.13G28. Compulsive and problem gambling.13G29. Criminal activity.§ 13G21. Commencement of event outcome prediction wagering operations.20260HB2497PN3382 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 An event outcome prediction wagering licensee may not conduct event outcome prediction wagering until the board determines that the licensee:(1) Is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter, including the payment in full of the license fee under section 13G19 (relating to fees). (2) Has satisfied all the required conditions prescribed by the board and is prepared in all respects to conduct the wagering.§ 13G22. General duties of licensee.A licensee shall:(1) Upon request, provide the board with information regarding processes to ensure:(i) The accuracy and security of wagering operations, including internal audit protocols to safeguard assets and revenues.( ii) Reliable financial and other records, accounts and reports.(iii) The separate nature of deposits made by participants for wagering and operating expenses of the licensee.(2) Consistent with regulations of the board, establish procedures for:(i) The development and execution of an event contract.( ii) The receipt of wagers. (iii) The disbursement of payouts.(iv) The payment of license fees, license renewal fees, penalties and taxes.(v) The maintenance of records.20260HB2497PN3382 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) The inspection or release of information for the purpose of investigations and audits in accordance with this chapter.(vii) The security of wagering operations, including general operating protocols for wagering.(viii) Providing information to the board for the implementation, administration and enforcement of this chapter.§ 13G23. Records.(a) Condition for continued operations.--As a condition of continued operation of event outcome prediction wagering under a license, a licensee shall maintain records pertaining to the wagering and the participants in a manner and location within this Commonwealth as prescribed by the board.(b) Nature of records.--Records shall be:(1) Segregated by separate accounts within the licensee's records.(2) Immediately available for inspection upon request of the board, the bureau, the department, the Pennsylvania State Police or the Attorney General, or agents thereof, to determine compliance with this chapter.(3) Submitted for audit as prescribed by the board.(4) Maintained for a period as prescribed by the board.§ 13G24. Consumer protections.(a) Self-exclusion list.--An event contract must contain a statement that a participant may request, and that a licensee must honor the request, that the participant be placed on a self-exclusion list to restrict the participant from making a wager in accordance with the event contract for a specified period.20260HB2497PN3382 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Cooling off period.--An event contract must contain a statement that a participant may cancel the event contract for any reason within three days of signing the event contract, by providing to the licensee written notice, or other notice as specified in the event contract, of the cancellation. Short-term wagering under an event contract may not occur until the three-day period has lapsed.(c) Secure transactions.--A licensee shall ensure that financial transactions and the submittal of other information regarding wagering operations are secure and that any financial or other information remains confidential in accordance with Federal and State law, subject to any investigation or audit authorized under this chapter.(d) Resolution of disputes.--An event contract must contain information on how a participant may file a complaint with the board regarding a dispute over the wagering or any other matter contained in the event contract.§ 13G25. Disclosures.Each licensee shall ensure that:(1) The fees and conditions regarding its event outcome prediction wagering are disclosed under an event contract in a clear, concise and understandable manner to participants.(2) The rights of participants regarding wagering are disclosed under an event contract in a clear, concise and understandable manner to participants.§ 13G26. Wagering tax.(a) Imposition.--Each licensee shall report to the department and pay from its daily gross event outcome prediction wagering revenue, on a form and in the manner prescribed by the department, a tax of 20% of the daily gross event outcome 20260HB2497PN3382 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prediction wagering revenue.(b) Deposits and distributions.--(1) The tax imposed under subsection (a) shall be:(i) Payable to the department on a weekly basis.(ii) Based upon gross event outcome prediction wagering revenue derived during the previous week.(2) All money owed to the Commonwealth under this section shall be held in trust for the Commonwealth by the licensee until the money is paid to the department.(3) A licensee shall establish a separate bank account into which gross event outcome prediction wagering revenue shall be deposited and maintained until the time that the money is paid to the department under this section or paid into the fund under section 13G27(a) (relating to local share assessment).(4) The tax imposed under subsection (a) shall be deposited into the General Fund.§ 13G27. Local share assessment.(a) Imposition.--In addition to the tax imposed under section 13G26 (relating to wagering tax), each licensee shall pay on a weekly basis, on a form and in the manner prescribed by the department, a local share assessment into a restricted receipt account established within the fund.(b) Deposits and distributions.--(1) A ll money owed under this section shall be held in trust by the licensee until the money is paid into the account described in subsection (a).(2) Money in the account described in subsection (a) is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purposes specified under this section.20260HB2497PN3382 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The department shall, on a quarterly basis, make distributions from the local share assessments deposited into the account described in subsection (a) into a restricted receipt account established in the Commonwealth Financing Authority to be used exclusively for grants for projects in the public interest in this Commonwealth.(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Local share assessment." Two percent of a licensee's daily gross event outcome prediction wagering revenue.§ 13G28. Compulsive and problem gambling.(a) Transfer to Compulsive and Problem Gambling Treatment Fund.--Each year, from the tax imposed under section 13G 26 (relating to wagering tax), an amount equal to 0.002 multiplied by the total gross event outcome prediction wagering revenue of all active and operating licensees shall be transferred into the Compulsive and Problem Gambling Treatment Fund established under section 1509 (relating to compulsive and problem gambling program).(b) Transfer to Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.--Each year, from the tax imposed under section 13G26 , an amount equal to 0.002 multiplied by the total gross event outcome prediction wagering revenue of all active and operating licensees shall be transferred to the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or a successor agency to be used for drug and alcohol addiction treatment services, including treatment for drug and alcohol addiction related to compulsive and problem gambling, as specified in section 1509.1 (relating to drug and alcohol treatment).20260HB2497PN3382 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 13G29. Criminal activity.Event outcome prediction wagering conducted by a licensee in accordance with this chapter shall not constitute a criminal activity under 18 Pa.C.S. § 5514 (relating to pool selling and bookmaking).SUBCHAPTER DENFORCEMENT AND PENALTIESSec.13G31. Noncompliance generally.13G32. Unauthorized wagering.§ 13G31. Noncompliance generally.An event outcome prediction wagering licensee that fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter shall be subject to administrative sanctions imposed by the board, including the suspension or revocation of an event outcome prediction wagering license, or other penalties authorized under this part.§ 13G32. Unauthorized wagering.(a) Offense defined.--( 1) A person may not c onduct event outcome prediction wagering, including entering into event contracts, if the person:(i) does not have a valid license; or(ii) is not in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.(2) A person may not knowingly provide services with respect to event outcome prediction wagering if the event outcome prediction wagering is conducted by a person without a valid license.(3) An individual may not knowingly participate in event outcome prediction wagering if:20260HB2497PN3382 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) the event outcome prediction wagering is conducted by a person without a valid license; or(ii) the individual is under 21 years of age.(b) Grading of offense.--(1) A person that violates subsection (a)(1):(i) For a first violation, commits a misdemeanor of the first degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $10,000.(ii) For a second or subsequent violation, commits a felony of the second degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $25,000.(2) A person that violates subsection (a)(2):(i) For a first violation, commits a misdemeanor of the first degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $10,000.(ii) For a second or subsequent violation, commits a felony of the second degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $25,000.(3) An individual who violates subsection (a)(3):(i) For a first violation, commits a misdemeanor of the first degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $10,000.(ii) For a second or subsequent violation, commits a felony of the second degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $20,000.( c) Forfeiture.-- (1) I f a person conducts wagering in violation of subsection (a)(1), the person shall forfeit all winnings that resulted from the wagering.(2) The forfeited winnings under paragraph (1) shall be 20260HB2497PN3382 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deposited into the Compulsive and Problem Gambling Treatment Fund established under section 1509(b) (relating to compulsive and problem gambling program).(d) Tax liability.-- A person that conducts wagering in violation of subsection (a)(1)(i) shall be liable for all taxes required by this chapter in the same manner and amounts as if the person were a licensee.(e) Deposit of fines.--All fines imposed in accordance with subsection (b) shall be deposited into the General Fund.SUBCHAPTER EMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.13G41. Regulatory authority.13G42. Temporary regulations.§ 13G41. Regulatory authority.In accordance with this chapter, the board shall promulgate regulations that establish standards and procedures for the implementation, administration and enforcement of event outcome prediction wagering, including:(1) The form and manner of submitting an application for a license to conduct the wagering, including consent to conduct a background investigation.(2) The form and contents of an event contract.(3) The conduct of the wagering, including: (i) The manner in which wagers are received, payouts are remitted and point spreads, lines, odds and other related matters are determined under an event contract.(ii) Notice regarding minimum and maximum wagers for the wagering.(iii) An age verification system, to ensure that 20260HB2497PN3382 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individuals who are under 21 years of age do not participate in the wagering.(iv) Safeguards to ensure against money laundering, insider trading or other activity involving a criminal or improper purpose.(v) The restriction on wagering involving sensitive economic, political or social events or circumstances.(4) In consultation with the department, the method for calculating gross event outcome prediction wagering revenue and for the daily counting and recording of cash and cash equivalents received in the conduct of the wagering, including ensuring that internal controls are followed, financial books and records are maintained and audits are conducted.(5) Assistance with compulsive and problem gambling relating to the wagering.(6) Providing information relating to the wagering in the board's annual report required under section 1211(a.1) (relating to reports of board).(7) How to provide written information to the board by each licensee regarding the wagering, including rules, payouts and other related matters specified in an event contract.(8) Specifications regarding the security of information provided in an event contract and submitted through a digital service.(9) Access by the board to information regarding event contracts and digital services used in the wagering to ensure compliance with this chapter.(10) The maintenance and organization of records.20260HB2497PN3382 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (11) The complaint and dispute resolution process regarding wagering and actions taken in the performance of duties under an event contract.(12) The amount and payment of the penalty described under section 13G19 (relating to fees).§ 13G42. Temporary regulations.(a) Authorization.--No later than one year after the effective date of this subsection, to facilitate the prompt implementation of this chapter, the department shall issue temporary regulations as may be necessary and appropriate to implement, administer and enforce this chapter. Regulations adopted after this one-year period shall be promulgated as provided by statute.(b) Notice.-- Upon the issuance of the temporary regulations, the department shall transmit notice of the issuance of the temporary regulations to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(c) Posting.--The department shall post the temporary regulations on its publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Expiration.--The temporary regulations shall expire no later than two years following publication of the temporary regulations in accordance with subsection (b).(e) Exemption from certain laws.--The temporary regulations shall be exempt from the following:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.20260HB2497PN3382 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(f) Permanent regulations.--Prior to the expiration of the temporary regulations, the department shall propose for approval permanent regulations as provided by statute and in accordance with section 13G41 (relating to regulatory authority).Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of 4 Pa.C.S. § 13G42 shall take effect in 60 days.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect upon the publication of the notice described in 4 Pa.C.S. § 13G42(b).20260HB2497PN3382 - 22 - 123456789101112131415